Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5415.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 15. Beginning October 1, 2027, notwithstanding any other provision of this act, the fund shall not finance or otherwise support a project or an economic development project, or provide a loan, grant, or other assistance to an entity, if doing so would violate the corporate welfare prohibition compact act. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. ____ (request no. S02934'25) or House Bill No. 5413 (request no. H02934'25) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.